sk-SK: Formát suchého zipsu: Káblová páska/popruh; Bodky/kolieska; Podložky; Kotúč/páska; Štvorce; Pásiky; Iné
pt-BR: Fecho de contato formato: Abraçadeira/tira de cabo; Pontos/moedas; Almofadas; Rolo/fita; Quadrados; Tiras; Outros
ru: Формат текстильной застежки: Кабельная стяжка/ремешок; Точки/кружочки; Накладки; Рулон/лента; Квадраты; Полоски; Другое
sl-SI: Format sprijemalnega traku (ježka): Kabelska vezica/trak; Pike/krogi; Blazinice; Rola/trak; Kvadrati; Trakovi; Drugo
nl: Klittenbandsluiting formaat: Kabelbinder/bandje; Rondjes; Pads; Rol/tape; Vierkantjes; Stroken; Overig
ro-RO: Formatul sistemului de fixare cu arici: Bridă/curea; Puncte/bănuți; Petice; Rolă/bandă; Pătrate; Benzi; Altele
hr-HR: Format čičak trake: Vezica za kabele / traka; Točkice/krugovi; Jastučići; Rola/traka; Kvadratići; Trakice; Ostalo
ja: フックとループファスナー形式: ケーブルタイ/ストラップ; ドット/コイン; パッド; ロール/テープ; 正方形; ストリップ; その他
de: Format des Klettverschlusses: Kabelbinder/-gurt; Klebepunkte; Pads; Rolle/Band; Quadrate; Streifen; Andere
sv: Kardborrebandsformat: Buntband/rem; Rundlar; Dynor; Rulle/tejp; Fyrkanter; Remsor; Annat
pl: Format rzepu: Opaska kablowa / pasek; Kropki / monety; Podkładki; Rolka / taśma; Kwadraty; Paski; Inny
th: รูปแบบตัวยึดแบบตีนตุ๊กแก: เคเบิลไทร์/สายรัด; จุด/เหรียญ; แผ่น; ม้วน/เทป; สี่เหลี่ยม; แถบ; อื่นๆ
it: Formato della chiusura a strappo: Fascetta/Cinghia; Punti/Dischetti; Tamponi; Rotolo/Nastro; Quadrati; Strisce; Altro
tr: Cırt cırtlı bağlantı formatı: Kablo bağı/kayış; Nokta/yuvarlak; Ped; Rulo/bant; Kare; Şerit; Diğer
zh-CN: 钩环扣件形式: 扎带/绑带; 圆点型/硬币型; 垫片; 卷状/带状; 方形; 条形; 其他
el: Μορφή αυτοκόλλητης ταινίας: Δεματικό καλωδίων/λουράκι; Κουκκίδες/κέρματα; Επιθέματα; Ρολό/ταινία; Τετράγωνα; Λωρίδες; Άλλο
lt-LT: Lipnios juostos formatas: Kabelio dirželis / juosta; Skridinėliai; Pagalvėlės; Rulonas / juosta; Kvadratai; Juostelės; Kita
en: Hook-and-loop fastener format: Cable tie/strap; Dots/coins; Pads; Roll/tape; Squares; Strips; Other
zh-TW: 魔鬼氈扣件形式: 束線帶/綁帶; 圓點狀; 墊片狀; 捲狀/膠帶; 方形; 條狀; 其他
fi: Tarranauhakiinnityksen muoto: Nippuside/hihna; Pisteet/ympyrät; Palat; Rulla/teippi; Neliöt; Suikaleet; Muu
pt-PT: Formato de fecho de velcro: Abraçadeira/tira; Pontos/círculos; Almofadas; Rolo/fita; Quadrados; Tiras; Outro
nb: Borrelåsformat: Strips/stropp; Prikker/mynter; Pute; Rull/teip; Firkanter; Strimler; Annet
ko: 벨크로 잠금장치 형식: 케이블 타이/스트랩; 도트/코인; 패드; 롤/테이프; 스퀘어; 스트립; 기타
vi: Định dạng khóa dán: Dây rút/dây đai; Chấm/đồng xu; Miếng đệm; Cuộn/băng dính; Hình vuông; Dải; Khác
fr: Format de la fermeture autoagrippante: Attache-câbles/sangle; Pastilles; Pièces; Rouleau/Ruban; Carrés; Bandes; Autre
es: Formato del sujetador de velcro: Brida/correa; Puntos/monedas; Almohadillas; Rollo/cinta; Cuadrados; Tiras; Otro
bg-BG: Формат на велкро закопчалката: Кабелна превръзка/лента; Точки/монети; Подложки; Ролка/лента; Квадрати; Ленти; Друго
da: Format for burrelukning: Kabelbinder/strop; Prikker/mønter; Pads; Rulle/bånd; Firkanter; Strimler; Andet
cs: Formát suchého zipu: Stahovací/upínací pásek; Tečky/kolečka; Podložky; Role/páska; Čtverce; Pruhy; Jiné
hu: Tépőzáras rögzítő formátuma: Kábelkötöző/pánt; Pontok/érmék; Párnák; Tekercs/szalag; Négyzetek; Csíkok; Egyéb